Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1361 of Title 25, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer
to terminate, deny, reduce, or alter post-employment benefits for
any retiree if:
1. The individual's retirement resulted, in whole or in part,
from disability-related separation; and
2. The change in benefits is causally related to the disability
or the circumstances of retirement.

B. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to
employers covered by the Oklahoma Anti-Discrimination Act.
C. Any claim for violation of this act shall be filed through
the Office of Civil Rights Enforcement or by the filing of an action
in the same manner provided by law for civil cases.
D. Whether pursuant to a final decision of the Office of Civil
Rights Enforcement or the judgment of a court, remedies for
violation may include reinstatement of benefits, damages, and civil
penalties up to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per violation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14042 MAH 01/10/26